District of Columbia statutes.
6-1041.02

Unlawful acts.

(a)

No inclusionary unit may be sold or leased to any person not authorized by the Mayor to purchase or rent the unit, except as may be permitted by regulation.

(b)

Except as provided in Chapter 26 of Title 11 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, the zoning regulations, no inclusionary unit may be sold or leased for more than the maximum rent or purchase price established by the Mayor pursuant to § 6-1041.03, unless the unit is sold to a land trust or similar entity authorized by regulation to purchase such units for resale at prices specified by the Mayor.

(c)

It shall be unlawful to construct an Inclusionary Development in a manner inconsistent with a Certificate of Inclusionary Zoning Compliance approved by the Mayor pursuant to § 6-1041.05.

History

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-275, § 102, 54 DCR 880
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 161(a), 56 DCR 1117

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-1041.04.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in the section heading.